District of Columbia statutes.
38-1853.03

Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide low-income parents residing in the District of Columbia, particularly parents of students who attend elementary schools or secondary schools implementing comprehensive support and improvement activities or targeted support and improvement activities under section 1111(d) [20 U.S.C. § 6311(d) ] of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, with expanded opportunities for enrolling their children in other schools in the District of Columbia, at least until the public schools in the District of Columbia have adequately addressed shortfalls in health, safety, and security, and the students in the District of Columbia public schools are testing in mathematics and reading at or above the national average.

Apr. 15, 2011, 125 Stat. 200, Pub. L. 112-10, Div. C, § 3003
Dec. 10, 2015, 129 Stat. 1802, Pub. L. 114-95, § 9215(ppp)(1)
Section 9215(ppp)(1) of Public Law 114-95 substituted “implementing comprehensive support and improvement activities or targeted support and improvement activities under section 1111(d) of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965” for “identified for improvement, corrective action, or restructuring under section 1116 of the Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (20 U.S.C. 6316).”